District of Columbia statutes.
47-3720

Rules.

The Mayor shall issue rules necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter and to provide for the granting of extensions of time within which to perform the duties imposed by this chapter, in accordance with subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2.

History

Feb. 24, 1987, D.C. Law 6-168, § 21, 33 DCR 7008
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-3720.

Delegation of Authority

Delegation of authority pursuant to Law 6-168, see Mayor’s Order 87-90, April 20, 1987.